Utah statutes.
54-17-801.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Contract customer" means a person who executes or will execute a renewable energy contract with a qualified utility.

(2)  "Qualified utility" means an electric corporation that serves more than 200,000 retail customers in the state.

(3)  "Renewable energy contract" means a contract under this section for the delivery of electricity from one or more renewable energy facilities to a contract customer requiring the use of a qualified utility's transmission or distribution system to deliver the electricity from a renewable energy facility to the contract customer.

(4)  "Renewable energy facility":

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), has the same meaning as renewable energy source defined in Section 54-17-601; and

(b)  does not include an electric generating facility whose costs have been included in a qualified utility's rates as a facility providing electric service to the qualified utility's system.

